Ohio, session 136, HB456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3735.661 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3735.661. (A) For the purpose of determining the 6
"first two amendments" referenced in division (B) of Section 3 7
of Am. Sub. S.B. 19 of the 120th general assembly or the "first 8
four amendments" referenced in division (C) of this section, an 9
amendment means any modification to an ordinance or resolution 10
adopted under section 3735.66 of the Revised Code that does any 11
of the following: 12
(1) Expands the geographic size of a community 13
reinvestment area; 14
(2) Increases a property's or category of property's 15
exempted percentage of assessed valuation, notwithstanding the 16
requirements of section 3735.66 of the Revised Code as that 17
section existed on July 21, 1994. Division (A)(2) of this 18
section does not authorize a municipal corporation or county to 19
increase a property's or category of property's exempted 20

H. B. No. 456 Page 2
As Introduced
percentage of assessed valuation pursuant to that section. 21
(3) Increases the term of any tax exemption or category of 22
tax exemptions, except as provided in division (B)(7) of this 23
section; 24
(4) Extends the duration of a community reinvestment area; 25
(5) Changes eligibility requirements for receiving tax 26
exemptions. 27
(B) For the purpose of determining the "first two 28
amendments" in division (B) of Section 3 of Am. Sub. S.B. 19 of 29
the 120th general assembly or the "first four amendments" 30
referenced in division (C) of this section, an amendment does 31
not include any modification to an ordinance or resolution 32
adopted under section 3735.66 of the Revised Code that does any 33
of the following: 34
(1) Restricts the availability of tax exemptions, 35
including any of the following: 36
(a) Removes area from or decreases the geographic size of 37
a community reinvestment area; 38
(b) Decreases a property's or category of property's 39
exempted percentage of assessed valuation, notwithstanding the 40
requirements of section 3735.66 of the Revised Code as that 41
section existed on July 21, 1994. Division (B)(1)(b) of this 42
section does not authorize a municipal corporation or county to 43
decrease a property's or category of property's exempted 44
percentage of assessed valuation pursuant to that section. 45
(c) Decreases the term of any tax exemption or category of 46
exemption; 47
(d) Shortens the period of time after which the granting 48

H. B. No. 456 Page 3
As Introduced
of tax exemptions may be terminated. 49
(2) Requires property owners or developers to enter into 50
an agreement to provide a number of affordable housing units as 51
a condition of granting, continuing, or revoking an exemption, 52
and authorizing municipal or county officials to implement such 53
conditions and agreements; 54
(3) Recognizes or confirms the continuing existence of a 55
community reinvestment area, including by providing a date after 56
which the area may be terminated; 57
(4) Recognizes or confirms a previously granted tax 58
exemption; 59
(5) Clarifies ambiguities or corrects defects in 60
previously enacted ordinances or resolutions; 61
(6) Makes modifications that are procedural or 62
administrative, including changing the designation of a housing 63
officer, the process for approving or appealing a tax exemption, 64
or the amount of any application fee, or modifying a community 65
reinvestment area housing council created under section 3735.69 66
of the Revised Code or a tax incentive review council under 67
section 5709.85 of the Revised Code; 68
(7) Increases the term of tax exemption for remodeling to 69
not more than that authorized by H.B. 463 of the 131st general 70
assembly for an exemption application that has been filed but 71
not yet granted, or has been filed, on or after April 6, 2017, 72
or that is filed on or after any other later date, provided the 73
maximum term of the exemption for such remodeling before the 74
ordinance's or resolution's modification was the maximum term 75
allowed under division (D)(1) or (2) of section 3735.67 of the 76
Revised Code as that section existed before its amendment by 77

H. B. No. 456 Page 4
As Introduced
H.B. 463 of the 131st general assembly. 78
(C) Notwithstanding Section 3 of Am. Sub. S.B. 19 of the 79
120th general assembly, the amendment or enactment by that act 80
of sections 3735.67, 3735.671, 3735.672, 3735.673, and 3735.68 81
of the Revised Code do not apply, and those sections as in 82
effect prior to those amendments and enactments do apply, to the 83
first four amendments to an ordinance or resolution adopted by a 84
municipal corporation under section 3735.66 of the Revised Code 85
prior to the effective date of those amendments and enactments, 86
provided that, at the time of the amendment to the ordinance or 87
resolution, the municipal corporation is an impacted city as 88
defined in section 1728.01 of the Revised Code. 89
Section 2. That existing section 3735.661 of the Revised 90
Code is hereby repealed. 91